Vermont, session 2025-2026, S171.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. chapter 43 is added to read:
CHAPTER 43. CLEAN FUELS PROGRAM
§ 4301. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Greenhouse gas” has the same meaning as in 10 V.S.A. § 552.
(2) “Low carbon fuel standards” means standards for the reduction of
greenhouse gas emissions, on average, per unit of fuel energy.
(3) “Motor vehicle” has the same meaning as in section 4 of this title.
VT LEG #384977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.171
2026 Page 2 of 7
§ 4302. CLEAN FUELS PROGRAM
(a) The Commissioner of Environmental Conservation shall adopt, by rule,
low carbon fuel standards for gasoline, diesel, and fuels used as substitutes for
gasoline or diesel, which shall be the basis of the Clean Fuels Program.
(b) The Commissioner may adopt the following related to the standards,
including:
(1) a schedule to phase in implementation of the standards in a manner
that reduces the average amount of greenhouse gas emissions per unit of fuel
energy of the fuels by 10 percent below 2018 levels by the year 2030 or by a
later date if the Commissioner determines that an extension is appropriate to
implement the standards;
(2) standards for greenhouse gas emissions attributable to the fuels
throughout their lifecycles, including emissions from the production, storage,
transportation, and combustion of the fuels and from changes in land use
associated with the fuels;
(3) provisions allowing the use of all types of low carbon fuels to meet
the low carbon fuel standards, including biofuels, biogas, natural gas, liquefied
petroleum gas, gasoline, diesel, hydrogen, and electricity;
(4) standards for the issuance of deferrals, established with adequate
lead time, as necessary to ensure adequate fuel supplies;
VT LEG #384977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.171
2026 Page 3 of 7
(5) exemptions for fuels that are used in volumes below thresholds
established by the Commissioner;
(6) standards, specifications, testing requirements, and other measures as
needed to ensure the quality of fuels produced in accordance with the low
carbon fuel standards, including the requirements for motor fuel quality; and
(7) adjustments to the amounts of greenhouse gas emissions per unit of
fuel energy assigned to fuels for combustion and drivetrain efficiency.
(c) Before adopting standards under this section, the Commissioner shall
consider the low carbon fuel standards of other states, including Washington
and Oregon, for the purpose of determining schedules and goals for the
reduction of the average amount of greenhouse gas emissions per unit of fuel
energy and the default values for these reductions for applicable fuels.
(d) The Commissioner shall provide exemptions and deferrals as necessary
to mitigate the costs of complying with the low carbon fuel standards upon a
finding that the 12-month rolling weighted average price of gasoline or diesel
in Vermont is not competitive with the 12-month rolling weighted average
price in New England.
(e) The Commissioner shall adopt, by rule, provisions for managing and
containing the costs of compliance with the standards, including provisions to
facilitate compliance with the standards by ensuring that persons may obtain
VT LEG #384977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.171
2026 Page 4 of 7
credits for fuels used as substitutes for gasoline or diesel and by creating
opportunities for persons to trade credits.
(f) The Commissioner shall exempt from the standards any person who
imports in a calendar year less than 500,000 gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel
in total. Any fuel imported by persons that are related or share common
ownership or control shall be aggregated together to determine whether a
person is exempt under this subsection.
(g)(1) The Commissioner, by rule, shall prohibit fuels that contain biodiesel
from being considered an alternative fuel under these standards unless the fuel
meets the following standards:
(A) Fuel that consists entirely of biodiesel, designated as B100, shall
comply with ASTM D6751 and shall have an oxidation stability induction
period of not less than eight hours as determined by the test method described
in European standard EN 15751.
(B) Fuel that consists of a blend of diesel fuel and between six and
20 volume percent biodiesel, and designated as biodiesel blends B6 to B20,
shall comply with ASTM D7467 and shall have an oxidation stability
induction period of not less than 20 hours as determined by the test method
described in European standard EN 15751.
(2) The Commissioner may adopt rules different from those required
under subdivision (1) of this subsection if an ASTM or EN standard applicable
VT LEG #384977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.171
2026 Page 5 of 7
to biodiesel is approved or amended after the effective date of this act or if the
Commissioner finds that different rules are necessary due to changes in
technology or fuel testing or production methods.
(3) As used in this subsection, “biodiesel” means a motor vehicle fuel
consisting of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids derived from
vegetable oils, animal fats, or other nonpetroleum resources, not including
palm oil.
(h) In adopting rules under this section, the Commissioner shall evaluate:
(1) safety, feasibility, net reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, and
cost-effectiveness;
(2) potential adverse impacts to public health and the environment,
including air quality, water quality, and the generation and disposal of waste in
this State;
(3) flexible implementation approaches to minimize compliance costs;
and
(4) technical and economic studies of comparable greenhouse gas
emissions reduction measures implemented in other states and any other
studies as determined by the Commissioner.
(i)(1) The provisions of this section shall not apply to fuel that is
demonstrated to have been used in any of the following:
VT LEG #384977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.171
2026 Page 6 of 7
(A) motor vehicles used solely as farm vehicles;
(B) motor vehicles used primarily to transport logs;
(C) motor vehicles that are not designed primarily to transport
persons or property, that are operated on highways only incidentally, and that
are used primarily for construction work;
(D) watercraft; and
(E) railroad locomotives.
(2) The Commissioner shall, by rule, adopt standards for persons to
qualify for the exemptions provided in this subsection.
Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION
(a) Public engagement process. Before commencing rulemaking, the
Commissioner of Environmental Conservation shall use the forms of public
engagement described in this subsection to inform the design and
implementation of the Clean Fuels Standard. Any failure by the Department of
Environmental Conservation to meet the specific procedural requirements of
this section shall not affect the validity of the Commissioner’s actions.
(1) The Department of Environmental Conservation shall hold at least
six public meetings, and of those meetings, at least three shall allow members
of the public to participate in person and remotely.
(2) The meetings shall be held in at least six different geographically
diverse counties of the State.
VT LEG #384977 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.171
2026 Page 7 of 7
(3) The meetings shall be recorded and posted on the Department’s
website.
(4) The Commissioner shall consult with the Agency of Transportation
and the Department of Public Service on the design of the Clean Fuels
Program.
(b) Interim reports. On or before September 1, 2027, and March 1, 2028,
the Commissioner shall submit to the General Assembly an interim report on
the development of the Clean Fuels Program.
(c) Final rules. On or before January 15, 2029, the Commissioner shall file
the final proposed rules on the Clean Fuels Program with the Secretary of
State.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384977 v.1